North Dakota, session 69, HB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-24.1-02.6 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-24.1-02.6. Medical assistance benefits - Eligibility criteria.
1. The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to otherwise eligible persons who
are medically needy persons who have countable income that does not exceed an amount
determined under subsection 2.
2. The department shall establish an income level for medically needy persons at an amount no
less than required by federal law.
3. The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to children and families coverage
groups and pregnant women without consideration of assets.
4. The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to otherwise eligible pregnant
women who are lawfully present in the United States.
5. The department may require, as a condition of eligibility, individuals eligible for Medicare part
A, B, or D to apply for such coverage.
6. The department shall disregard social security survivor income and court-ordered child
support for a child who is under the age of eighteen years and is enrolled in a medicaid waiver
under section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1915(c)].
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 50-24.1-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-24.1-26. Medicaid waivers - In-home services.
The department shall administer Medicaid waivers to provide in-home services to children with
extraordinary medical needs and to children up to the age of eighteen diagnosed with an autism
spectrum disorder who are under the age of twenty - one and would otherwise meet institutional level of
care. The department may prioritize applicants for the waiver for children with extraordinary medical
needs by degree of need.
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this Act is effective on July 1, 2026.

H. B. NO. 1067 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1067.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 2 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State